Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-803
Board of public works; surplus funds; investment.

Any surplus funds arising out of the operation of any municipal utilities by the board of public works, or by the city council of a city of the second class, where any of such utilities are not being operated by such a board, may be invested, if not invested pursuant to the provisions of any other law upon the subject, in like manner and subject to the same conditions as the investment of similar funds of cities of the first class, as provided in section 16-691.01.

Laws 1937, c. 34, § 1, p. 160;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-702;

R.S.1943, § 17-803;

Laws 1959, c. 51, § 1, p. 242;

Laws 1961, c. 47, § 5, p. 187;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 232.